Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 2 Ne Exeat

Cross references.

Attachment, T. 18, C. 3.

23-3-20.
Nature of ne exeat; when granted.

The writ of ne exeat shall issue to restrain a person from leaving the jurisdiction of the state. The writ may be granted in the following cases:

In favor of an obligor, promisor, or partner, against his co-obligor, joint promisor, or copartner equally or partly responsible with him for any duty to be performed;

Against persons illegally removing the property of a decedent or of a minor, at the instance of any person interested therein, or of a next friend of the minor;

At the instance of a remainderman or reversioner against anyone attempting to remove the property in which the remainder or reversion exists or may contingently exist;

At the instance of a mortgagee against a person holding the equity of redemption;

At the instance of any person interested legally or equitably in property about to be removed, where no adequate remedy is afforded at law.

History.

Laws 1814, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 526; Code 1863, § 3147; Code 1868, § 3159; Code 1873, § 3226; Code 1882, § 3226; Civil Code 1895, § 4886; Civil Code 1910, § 5459; Code 1933, § 37-1401.

23-3-21.
Showing required.

In every case of application for a writ of ne exeat, the complaining party shall show that no adequate remedy is afforded at law, and that the defendant is removing or about to remove himself, his property, or the specific property to which the complainant claims title or an interest.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3148; Code 1868, § 3160; Code 1873, § 3227; Code 1882, § 3227; Civil Code 1895, § 4887; Civil Code 1910, § 5460; Code 1933, § 37-1402.

23-3-22.
Verification necessary; bond and additional verification at judge’s discretion.

In every application for a writ of ne exeat, the petition or motion must be verified by one or more of the complainants.

The judge may, in his discretion, require the complainant to give bond and security for the payment of any damages which the defendant may recover from him for obtaining the writ, before granting an order for the issuing of the same, and may require a verification by all or any of the complainants.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 219, § 4; Ga. L. 1857, p. 109, § 1; Code 1863, § 3151; Code 1868, § 3163; Code 1873, § 3230; Code 1882, § 3230; Civil Code 1895, § 4890; Civil Code 1910, § 5463; Code 1933, § 37-1405.

23-3-23.
Defendant’s bond; responsibility of officer taking insufficient security.

The defendant may relieve himself, his property, or the specific property from the restraint imposed by giving bond in double the value of plaintiff’s claim, with good security, to the officer serving the process, for the forthcoming of each or either, according to the tenor of the writ, to answer to complainant’s claim or abide by the order and decree of the court. The judge granting the writ may, in his discretion, require a larger bond. An officer receiving insufficient security shall be held surety himself, and the sureties on his bond may be held responsible therefor.

History.

Laws 1830, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 527; Code 1863, § 3149; Code 1868, § 3161; Code 1873, § 3228; Code 1882, § 3228; Civil Code 1895, § 4888; Civil Code 1910, § 5461; Code 1933, § 37-1403.

23-3-24.
Disposition of property.

If the defendant fails or refuses to replevy the property, the court may, in its discretion, make such disposition of it as shall appear most advantageous to all parties.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3150; Code 1868, § 3162; Code 1873, § 3229; Code 1882, § 3229; Civil Code 1895, § 4889; Civil Code 1910, § 5462; Code 1933, § 37-1404.

23-3-25.
Issuance of writ without judge’s sanction.

In cases of emergency, upon the affidavit of the complainant that he cannot obtain the sanction of the judge in time to remedy the mischief, the writ of ne exeat may issue at once, to continue until the first term of the court to which it is returnable, unless earlier heard by order of the judge.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3152; Code 1868, § 3164; Code 1873, § 3231; Code 1882, § 3231; Civil Code 1895, § 4891; Civil Code 1910, § 5464; Code 1933, § 37-1406.